District of Columbia statutes.
34-2410.05

Private fire hydrants: determination of ownership.

(a)

(1)

The Mayor shall determine the ownership of a private fire hydrant through a title search. The location of a private fire hydrant on the property of a single-family dwelling is insufficient, by itself, for determining ownership under this subsection.

(2)

The Mayor shall notify the person identified as the owner of the private fire hydrant, in writing, that the person has been identified as the owner of the private fire hydrant and, as such, is responsible for the maintenance, repair, and replacement of the private fire hydrant.

(b)

If the Mayor is unable to establish ownership of a private fire hydrant under subsection (a) of this section, the District shall be responsible for the maintenance, repair, and replacement of the private fire hydrant.

(c)

This section shall not apply to private fire hydrants on the property of non-residential institutions, including colleges and universities, or on the property of the federal government or a foreign government.

Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-337, § 6, 58 DCR 609
This section is referenced in § 34-2410.04.